Utah, session 2026, SB33.
Section 1. Section 13-1b-301 is amended to read:13-1b-301. Application for sunrise review -- Fees.(1)If a government requestor or a representative of an occupation that is not a regulated occupation proposes that the state make the occupation a regulated occupation, the government requestor or representative shall, before the introduction of any proposed legislation, submit to the office an application for sunrise review in a form the office prescribes.(2)(1)The application described in Subsection (1) An application for sunrise review shall describe:(a)why making the occupation a regulated occupation is necessary to protect against present, recognizable, and significant harm to the health, safety, or financial welfare of the public; and(b)the least restrictive regulation of the occupation that would protect against present, recognizable, and significant harm to the health, safety, or financial welfare of the public.(3)(2)If a representative of an occupation submits an application in accordance with this section, the application shall include a nonrefundable fee of $500.(4)(3)All application fees collected under this section shall be deposited into the General Fund.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.